Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3979
Classification of raw milk.

The classification of raw milk for manufacturing purposes shall be based on sight and odor and quality control tests for somatic cells, bacterial content, sediment content, and drug residues. Classification shall be either acceptable, probational, or reject.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 4, p. 72;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.90;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 15;

Laws 1981, LB 333, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3915;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 15.